Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.060

Trial procedure—Powers of referee—Referee to provide clerical personnel.

(1) Subject to the limitations and directions prescribed in the order of reference, the trial conducted by a referee shall be conducted in the same manner as a trial by the court. Unless waived in whole or in part, the referee shall apply the rules of pleading, practice, procedure, and evidence used in the superior courts of this state. The referee shall have the same power to grant adjournments, administer oaths, preserve order, punish all violations thereof upon such trial, compel the attendance of witnesses, and to punish them for nonattendance or refusal to be sworn or testify, as is possessed by the court.

(2) A referee appointed under RCW 4.48.010 shall provide clerical personnel necessary for the conduct of the proceeding, including a court reporter.

[ 1984 c 258 s 517; Code 1881 s 253; 1877 p 52 s 257; 1869 p 62 s 257; 1854 p 169 s 210; RRS s 374.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.